test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_utke_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - utke: # ok UTKE
    utke+N+Sg+Nom:  utke
    utke+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Ill:  uutkán
    utke+N+Sg+Loc:  uđheest
    utke+N+Sg+Com:  uđhijn
    utke+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊđhettáá
    utke+N+Ess:  utken
    utke+N+Par:  utked
    utke+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊđheh
    utke+N+Pl+Gen:  [uuđhij, uˊđhij]
    utke+N+Pl+Acc:  uuđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Ill:  uđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Loc:  uuđhijn
    utke+N+Pl+Com:  uˊđhijguin
    utke+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊđhijttáá
